Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Chapter 11

Cash Basis Law of 1937

9-11-101. Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Cash Basis Law of 1937.”

Acts 1937, ch. 300, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3516.11; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-1101.

Cross-References. Public entities, information concerning debt obligation issuances, §9-21-134.

9-11-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Bond order,” as applied to a city, means the ordinance authorizing the issuance of bonds of the city, and, as applied to a county, means the order of resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds of the county;

“Clerk” means the officer acting as clerk of the governing body;

“Funding bonds” means bonds issued to pay or to extend the time of payment of debt not evidenced by bonds;

“Governing body,” as applied to a county, means the county legislative body, and, as applied to a city, means the city council, board of commissioners, board of mayor and aldermen or the board or body in which the general legislative powers of the city are vested;

“Refunding bonds” means bonds issued to pay or to extend the time of payment of debts evidenced by bonds; and

“Unit” includes each county and city in the state, which shall issue bonds under this chapter.

Acts 1937, ch. 300, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 3516.12; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 8; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-1102; Acts 2010, ch. 868, § 30.

9-11-103. Issuance of funding bonds.

In order that the fiscal affairs of the counties and cities in the state may be placed on a cash basis, each such unit is authorized and empowered to issue at one (1) time or from time to time bonds of the unit for the following purposes:

Funding any or all warrants, notes or other indebtedness of such unit not evidenced by bonds, and interest accrued thereon, which shall be outstanding at the close of the fiscal year immediately preceding the authorization of such funding bonds;

Refunding any or all bonds of the unit, and interest accrued thereon, whether such unit issued such bonds or assumed or became liable therefor, including bonds not matured if the unmatured bonds be then redeemable or if the holders thereof be willing to surrender the same for retirement, and including bonds belonging to the sinking fund of such unit; and

Paying any redemption premium upon bonds so refunded and also such expenses as the governing body may deem reasonable and proper for carrying out this chapter.

Acts 1937, ch. 300, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 3516.13; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-1103.

Cross-References. Additional bonds authorized, §9-11-109.

Administration by the comptroller of the treasury, 4-3-305.

Refunding on consolidation of counties, §§5-3-113 —5-3-121.

9-11-104. Contents of bond order.

All bonds issued by a unit under this chapter shall be authorized by a bond order passed by the governing body of the unit. Notwithstanding any public or private statute relating to the unit, such bond order may be finally passed at the meeting at which the same shall be introduced. The bond order shall state:

A brief description of the indebtedness to be funded or refunded sufficient to identify such indebtedness, and the amount of redemption premium, if any, to be paid upon bonds refunded and the amount of expenses, if any, to be paid from the proceeds of bonds;

The maximum aggregate principal amount of bonds to be issued;

That a tax sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds shall be annually levied upon all taxable property in the unit; and

That the bond order shall take effect upon its passage and shall not be submitted to the voters of the unit.

Acts 1937, ch. 300, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 3516.14; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-1104.

9-11-105. Publication of bond order.

A bond order shall be published once in each of two (2) consecutive weeks after its final passage. Such publication shall be made in a newspaper published in the unit. If there is no such newspaper, the bond order shall be posted at the door of the building in which the governing body usually holds its meetings and at three (3) other public places in the unit. A notice in substantially the following form (the blanks being first properly completed), with the printed or written signature of the clerk appended thereto, shall be published with the bond order:

“The foregoing order (ordinance) was passed on the day of , 20 , and was first published (posted) on the day of , 20 .

“Any action or proceeding questioning the validity of the order (ordinance) or the indebtedness to be funded (or refunded) or the tax to be levied for the payment of the principal and interest of such bonds, must be commenced within thirty (30) days after its first publication (or posting).

Clerk.”

Acts 1937, ch. 300, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 3516.16; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-1105.

9-11-106. Limitation of actions to invalidate bonds.

Any action or proceedings in any court to set aside a bond order, or to obtain any other relief upon the ground that the order is invalid, or that the indebtedness to be funded or refunded is invalid, or that there is no authority for the levy of a tax to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds, must be commenced within thirty (30) days after the first publication of the notice aforementioned and the bond order referred to in the notice. After the expiration of such period of limitation, no right of action or defense founded upon the invalidity of the bond order or the indebtedness to be funded or refunded or the tax to be levied shall be asserted, nor shall the validity of the bond order or of the funding or refunding bonds to be issued or the tax to be levied for the payment of the principal of and interest thereon, be open to question in any court upon any ground whatever, except in an action or proceedings commenced within such period.

Acts 1937, ch. 300, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 3516.17; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-1106.

9-11-107. Resolution for issuance of bonds.

At any time after the passage of the bond order, the governing body of a unit shall have full authority by resolution to provide for the issuance of the bonds authorized by such bond order. Such resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds may be introduced and finally passed at any regular or duly called special meeting of the governing body and shall be in force and effect from and after its passage.

The governing body shall by resolution determine the rate or rates of interest to be paid on the bonds, and the time or times of payment of such interest, and the maturity or maturities of the bonds, which shall be at a time or times not exceeding twenty (20) years from the date of the bonds in the case of funding bonds, and not exceeding thirty (30) years from the date of bonds in the case of refunding bonds; provided, that with the approval of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee, funding bonds may be made to mature at any time or times not exceeding thirty (30) years from the date of the bonds and refunding bonds may be made to mature at any time or times not exceeding forty (40) years from the date of the bonds.

The governing body shall also by resolution determine the form of the bonds, the officers by whom they shall be executed and the place or places in Tennessee or in any other state at which the principal and interest shall be payable.

In case any of the officers whose signatures appear on the bonds or coupons shall cease to be such officers before the delivery of such bonds, such signatures shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if they had remained in office until such delivery.

The bonds may be made registrable as to principal alone and as to both principal and interest, under such terms and conditions as may be determined by the governing body, and provisions may be made for the exchange of fully registered bonds for coupon bonds and of coupon bonds for fully registered bonds.

Acts 1937, ch. 300, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 3516.18; Acts 1969, ch. 283, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-1107; Acts 2010, ch. 868, § 31.

9-11-108. Annual statement by fiscal officer.

Before any funding or refunding bonds shall be issued under this chapter, a fiscal officer of the unit shall prepare a statement as of the beginning of the then current fiscal year, which statement shall show in detail the total outstanding bonds, notes, warrants and other evidences of indebtedness of the unit, together with the maturity dates thereof, interest rates, special provisions for payment, together with a description of the indebtedness proposed to be funded or refunded by the issuance of bonds. Such statement shall also show in detail the total tax collections of the unit for the preceding year, the amount of delinquent taxes, and the amount of expenditures of all funds during the preceding fiscal year, the proposed maturity or maturities of the new funding or refunding bonds to be issued, and any and all other pertinent information which may be requested by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee. Such statement shall be filed with the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee, together with an application from the governing body of the unit requesting that the issuance of the proposed bonds be approved. If the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee shall determine that, in the comptroller of the treasury's or the comptroller's designee's opinion, the unit can fulfill this chapter as hereinafter set forth, the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee shall so certify in writing to the unit, and such certificate shall be recorded in the minutes of the unit.

Acts 1937, ch. 300, § 14; C. Supp. 1950, § 3516.23 (Williams, § 3516.24); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-1108; Acts 2010, ch. 868, § 32.

9-11-109. Sale price — Exchange — Premiums and discount.

The governing body may sell any or all of the bonds authorized under this chapter in such manner and for such price as it may determine to be for the best interest of the unit. Any or all of the bonds authorized under this chapter may be exchanged for the bonds to be refunded thereby or the evidences of indebtedness to be funded thereby, including bonds not matured or redeemable if the holder thereof be willing to surrender the same for retirement. Additional bonds may be authorized and sold under §9-11-103(3), in an amount sufficient to pay:

Any redemption premium on bonds refunded; and

If such funding or refunding bonds shall be sold or delivered in exchange at a discount, the amount of such discount.

Acts 1937, ch. 300, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 3516.19; Acts 1969, ch. 283, § 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-1109.

9-11-110. Exercise of powers.

Except as hereinafter provided, the authority conferred by this chapter may be exercised at any time and from time to time, and the authorization of funding or refunding bonds by one (1) bond order shall not prevent the authorization of additional funding or refunding bonds by subsequent bond order or orders. One (1) resolution providing for the issuance of funding or refunding bonds may provide for the issuance of two (2) or more separate series of such bonds, and each series or class may have different terms and provisions from the others, and the bonds of each series or class may bear interest at different rates.

Acts 1937, ch. 300, § 12; C. Supp. 1950, § 3516.21 (Williams, § 3516.22); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-1110.

9-11-111. Exemption from taxation.

Any bonds issued pursuant to this chapter and the income therefrom are exempt from all state, county and municipal taxation except for inheritance, transfer and estate taxes and except as otherwise provided in this code.

Acts 1937, ch. 300, § 13; C. Supp. 1950, § 3516.22 (Williams, § 3516.23); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-1111; Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 41.

9-11-112. Tax levy and sinking fund provisions.

All bonds issued under this chapter shall be direct and general obligations of the unit issuing the same, for the payment of which the full faith and credit of the unit shall be irrevocably pledged. In each fiscal year while any funding or refunding bonds issued under this chapter shall be outstanding, there shall be levied upon all taxable property in the unit an ad valorem tax sufficient to pay the interest thereon as it falls due and the principal of such bonds which shall then have matured or which shall mature within the same fiscal year, and any sinking fund payments which may be provided for by the bonds or by the resolution authorizing the same, as well as all deficits in such interest, principal and sinking fund payments arising from failure to comply with this chapter or by failure to collect the taxes levied or otherwise; provided, that the governing body, in its discretion, may levy in any fiscal year a tax sufficient to pay, in addition to the interest and principal which shall fall due in such fiscal year, any portion of the interest or principal which shall fall due in any succeeding fiscal year, and may also levy in any fiscal year a tax for sinking fund payments in addition to the tax required for such payments by the resolution authorizing any of such bonds. The governing body may provide in the resolution authorizing the issuance of any such funding or refunding bonds that any sinking fund provided for such bonds shall be used solely for the purpose of redemption of the bonds authorized by such resolution, and all bonds so purchased or redeemed shall be cancelled and shall not be reissued.

Acts 1937, ch. 300, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 3516.20; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-1112.

9-11-113. Annual cash basis budget.

In order that the fiscal affairs of a unit may be maintained on a cash basis after issuance of any funding or refunding bonds under this chapter, and in order that the current receipts of such unit shall be sufficient to meet current expenditures, an annual budget shall be prepared by an official of the unit designated by the governing body for that purpose, which budget shall include the following:

The full amount required for interest on the indebtedness of the unit and for sinking funds and for principal of serial bonds maturing during the fiscal year;

A detailed statement of the amounts required during the fiscal year for the expense of conducting or operating each department, division, office or board and the subdivisions of each;

The amount of any cash deficit, being the sum of all outstanding and unpaid bills or other lawful obligations and all amounts payable to all special funds of the unit at the close of the preceding fiscal year incurred for debt or other lawful charges in connection with the operation of the unit, to the extent that such sum exceeds the cash on hand or on deposit to the credit of the general funds of the unit, exclusive, however, of any cash derived from prepaid taxes or other sources applicable to the budget of the succeeding fiscal year; and

An itemized estimate of the cash receipts to be available during the current fiscal year, but such itemized estimate shall be subject to the following provisions:

Such estimate of collections of delinquent taxes shall not exceed an amount which represents the same percentage of the amount of taxes delinquent on the first day of the current fiscal year as the percentage of delinquent taxes outstanding on the first day of the preceding fiscal year which were actually collected in cash during such preceding fiscal year;

Such estimate of collections of special assessments shall not exceed an amount which represents the same percentage of the amount of special assessments unpaid and owing to the unit on the first day of the current fiscal year as the percentage of special assessments unpaid and owing to the unit on the first day of the preceding fiscal year which were actually collected in cash during such preceding fiscal year;

Such estimate of collections of miscellaneous revenues from sources other than taxes or special assessments shall in no instance nor as to any item be in an amount in excess of the amount of such miscellaneous revenues collected in cash in the preceding year; provided, that there may be included in the estimated cash receipts such amount of additional miscellaneous revenues to be derived from sources other than ad valorem taxes or special assessments as may be approved by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee; and

The amount of the cash surplus, being an amount not larger than the amount of cash on hand or on deposit to the credit of the general funds of the unit at the close of the preceding fiscal year exclusive, however, of any cash derived from prepaid taxes or other sources applicable to the budget of the succeeding fiscal year, to the extent that such cash is in excess of all outstanding and unpaid bills or other obligations lawfully incurred during such fiscal year and all amounts payable therefrom to all special funds of the unit.

Acts 1937, ch. 300, § 15; C. Supp. 1950, § 3516.24 (Williams, § 3516.25); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-1113; Acts 2010, ch. 868, § 33.

9-11-114. Appropriation ordinance.

After receiving the annual budget estimate, the governing body of the unit shall prepare an appropriation ordinance or resolution, using the budget estimate as a basis, but appropriating such sums as the governing body may deem proper for the expenses listed under §9-11-113(2), whether greater or less than the budget estimate set forth under such subdivision (2), but no appropriation recommended by the budget estimate under §9-11-113(1) and (3) shall be reduced by the governing body, and the taxes levied for such appropriations may be over and above all other taxes authorized or limited by law.

Acts 1937, ch. 300, § 15; C. Supp. 1950, § 3516.24 (Williams, § 3516.25); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-1114.

9-11-115. Tax levy for cash basis.

Immediately after the passage of the appropriation ordinance or resolution, the governing body shall pass an ordinance or resolution levying upon all property subject to taxation within the unit and basing such levy upon the current tax collection experience of the preceding fiscal year, such rate of tax as may be required to produce the sum necessary to balance the budget upon a cash basis. The sum necessary to balance the budget shall be ascertained by deducting from the total cash appropriations made under §9-11-113(1), (2) and (3), such cash receipts applicable to such cash appropriations as may be estimated under the limitations of §9-11-113(4)(A)-(D). In order that the current tax levy so made shall be truly based upon the current tax collection experience of the preceding year, such current tax levy shall be determined by dividing the sum necessary to be raised in order to balance the budget by a percentage which does not exceed the percentage obtained by dividing the amount of current taxes collected in cash in the preceding fiscal year by the amount of the taxes levied and payable in such preceding fiscal year.

Acts 1937, ch. 300, § 16; C. Supp. 1950, § 3516.25 (Williams, § 3516.26); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-1115.

9-11-116. Enforcement power of the comptroller of the treasury or comptroller's designee.

The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee shall require such periodic information from a unit operating under this chapter and make such audits as the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee deems necessary, to the end that it may be ascertained that the budget of the unit is kept balanced during the life of bonds issued under this chapter. The annual budget of each unit operating under this chapter shall be submitted to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee at least three (3) weeks prior to its adoption. The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee must thereupon determine whether or not the budget will be in balance in accordance with this chapter. If the budget does not comply with this chapter, the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee shall have the power and authority to direct the governing body of the unit to adjust its estimates or to make additional tax levies sufficient to comply with this chapter. No budget shall be adopted by the governing body of a unit which shall have issued bonds under this chapter until it shall have been approved by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee. The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee shall approve the budget only when the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee is satisfied that it complies with this chapter.

Acts 1937, ch. 300, § 17; C. Supp. 1950, § 3516.26 (Williams, § 3516.27); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-1116; Acts 2010, ch. 868, § 34.

9-11-117. Tax anticipation notes.

The governing body of any unit which shall have issued bonds under this chapter may issue tax anticipation notes under chapter 21 of this title.

Acts 1937, ch. 300, § 18; C. Supp. 1950, § 3516.27 (Williams, § 3516.28); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-1117; Acts 1982, ch. 580, § 2; 1988, ch. 750, § 42.

9-11-118. Remedies of bondholders.

Any holder of bonds issued under this chapter, or any person or officer being a party in interest, may either at law or in equity by suit, action or mandamus, enforce and compel the performance of the duties required by this chapter of the governing body or any board or officer of the unit.

Inasmuch as the purpose of this chapter is to place and maintain the fiscal affairs of the counties and cities in the state on a cash basis, this chapter shall constitute an irrepealable contract with the holders of bonds issued under this chapter.

Acts 1937, ch. 300, § 19; C. Supp. 1950, § 3516.28 (Williams, § 3516.29); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-1118.

9-11-119. Nature and construction of chapter.

No restriction, limitation, or provision contained in any other law, either public or private, relating to the issuance of bonds, notes, or other obligations of a unit, or limiting the amount of taxes which may be levied in a unit, shall apply to bonds or notes issued under this chapter. The powers granted by this chapter are in addition to all other powers heretofore granted to a unit, and nothing herein contained shall be construed as prohibiting a unit from issuing bonds or notes under any public or private statute applicable to such unit. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as mandatory for any unit to issue funding or refunding bonds under the terms and conditions of this chapter.

Acts 1937, ch. 300, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 3516.15; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-1119; Acts 1982, ch. 580, § 3.